Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. Secretary of State

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

81A C.J.S. States § 132.

§ 9-1-301.
Custodian of state seal.

The secretary of state is the custodian of the great seal of the state.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 95, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 55; C.S. 1910, § 92; C.S. 1920, § 102; R.S. 1931, § 109-202; C.S. 1945, § 18-202; W.S. 1957, § 9-34; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-201

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to use of state seal, see §

9-1-303

.

For constitutional provisions as to great seal of the state, see art. 4, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to design of state seal, see §

8-3-101

.

§ 9-1-302.
Powers and duties; custodian of public records; preservation of proclamations of governor; removal of public documents prohibited; exceptions.

The secretary of state is the custodian of, and shall preserve:

All the public records, documents, acts and resolutions of the legislatures of the territory and state of Wyoming;

All proclamations of the governor proclaiming the effectiveness of constitutional amendments, corporate revocations and any other proclamation designated as a permanent record by the governor. The secretary of state shall preserve all other proclamations of the governor for one (1) year and then deliver them to the department of state parks and cultural resources for destruction or preservation as it deems desirable;

Property of the state when no other provision is made by law;

Copies of all clemency documents signed by the governor, including pardons, commutations of sentence, reprieves, remissions of fine or forfeiture, and restorations of civil rights.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the secretary of state shall not permit any original paper or public document, filed in the office, to be taken out of it unless called for by a resolution of either house of the legislature or for the examination of the governor. The secretary of state may store any original paper or public document, filed in the office, in any other state building within the capital city if the storage will protect the papers or documents from destruction and unauthorized access to the same or greater extent than storage in the office of the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 95, §§ 2, 6, 7; R.S. 1899, §§ 55, 59, 60; C.S. 1910, §§ 92, 96, 97; C.S. 1920, §§ 102, 106, 107; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-202, 109-206, 109-207; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-202, 18-206, 18-207; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-34, 9-37.1, 9-38, 9-39; Laws 1969, ch. 5, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-201

, 9-2-205 to 9-2-207; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 23, § 1; ch. 69, § 2; 2001, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to public records, see §§

16-4-201

to

16-4-205

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Stopping the Clock in the Wyoming Legislature,” see 10 Wyo. L.J. 203.

§ 9-1-303.
Powers and duties; affixing seal to and countersigning commissions and documents; certified copies of acts; file of commissions and appointments; publication of documents.

The secretary of state shall affix the great seal of the state to, and countersign:

Commissions;

Official acts which the governor is required by law to perform except his approval or disapproval of legislative acts; and

Other instruments when required or authorized by the governor.

The secretary of state shall deliver to every person upon request, copies of any act, resolution, order of the legislature, commission or other official act of the governor, roll, record, document, paper, bond or recognizance, deposited in the office by law, and certify the copies under his hand, and affix thereto the seal of the office upon tender of fees prescribed by law.

The secretary of state shall keep a file of all commissions issued and appointments made by the governor. The file shall specify:

The name of the person;

The office conferred or commission issued;

The district or county for which the appointment is made; and

The term of office.

The secretary of state shall make the following documents available to the public by publishing the documents on the secretary of state’s official website:

The constitution of the state of Wyoming;

A directory of state departments and selected employees.

The secretary of state may affix the great seal of the state to certificates or apostilles issued pursuant to W.S.

32-3-110

.

The secretary of state shall print and make available the constitution of the state of Wyoming upon payment of a fee established by rule and in an amount to recover the costs of printing the document.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 95, §§ 8 to 10; R.S. 1899, §§ 61 to 63; C.S. 1910, §§ 98 to 100; C.S. 1920, §§ 108 to 110; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-208 to 109-210; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-208 to 18-210; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-40 to 9-42; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-208 to 9-2-210; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2013 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 40, § 2, effective February 17, 2017; 2017 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions as to great seal of the state, see art. 4, § 15, Wyo. Const.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (d).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 40, § 2, added (e).

Laws 2017, ch. 40, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (d), substituted “make the following documents” for “print and make those documents” and added “by publishing the documents on the secretary of state's official website”; and added (e).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "32-3-110" for "32-1-114" in (e).

This section is mandatory

and the secretary of state has no right to refuse to affix seal to and countersign a commission issued by the governor to a person appointed by him to an office, because, in his judgment, the governor had no authority to make such appointment. State ex rel. Miller v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 409, 34 P. 1028,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 9-1-304.
Removal from state or impeachment; acting secretary of state; appointment; duties.

In case of removal from the state, or impeachment of the secretary of state, the governor shall appoint an acting secretary of state, who shall take the oath herein prescribed and perform the duties of the office during absence occasioned by the removal or pendency of impeachment.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 95, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 64; C.S. 1910, § 101; C.S. 1920, § 111; R.S. 1931, § 109-211; C.S. 1945, § 18-211; W.S. 1957, § 9-43; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-211

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to suspension of officer pending impeachment and as to filling vacancy, see §

9-1-203

.

As to compensation of persons appointed to fill vacancies generally, see §

9-3-101

.

For constitutional provisions relative to impeachment, see art. 3, §§ 17 and 18, Wyo. Const.

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

The words “oath herein prescribed” refer to § 1, ch. 95, Laws 1890-91, which section was codified but repealed by § 17, ch. 27, Laws 1971. For present provisions as to oath of officers, see §

9-1-102

.

§ 9-1-305.
Fees; amounts; collection; exceptions.

The secretary of state shall collect the following fees in advance for:

Except as provided in W.S. 32-3-110(c), certificate and seal, ten dollars ($10.00);

Filing any document, a minimum of three dollars ($3.00);

Issuing a notary public commission, sixty dollars ($60.00);

Recording each instrument of writing, three dollars ($3.00) for the first page;

Each subsequent page, one dollar ($1.00);

Copies of laws or documents recorded or filed in the office of the secretary of state, fifty cents ($.50) per page for the first ten (10) pages and fifteen cents ($.15) for each additional page. When the secretary of state furnishes a copy of any law already printed, he shall receive three dollars ($3.00) for each copy and three dollars ($3.00) for certifying and sealing the copies;

Issuing any other paper not herein enumerated, three dollars ($3.00).

The secretary of state shall receive no fee for the following services:

Issuing commissions to state, district and county officers;

Filing pardons, requisitions and appointments of agents;

Filing oaths of office.

When any document is delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing, the secretary of state may refuse the document for filing if:

The correct filing fee, any franchise tax, license fee, penalty or past due fees, taxes or penalties required to be paid have not been paid; and

Provision for payment of those items set forth in paragraph (i) of this section has not been established in a manner approved by the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 95, §§ 13, 14; 1899, ch. 69, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 66, 67; C.S. 1910, §§ 103, 104; C.S. 1920, §§ 113, 114; Laws 1921, ch. 124, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-213, 109-214; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-213, 18-214; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-45, 9-46; Laws 1977, ch. 20, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-213, 9-2-214; Laws 1981, ch. 47, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2011, ch. 113, § 2; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 40, § 2, effective February 17, 2017; 2021 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii), inserted “a notarial officer” and deleted “to notary public” preceding “thirty.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (c).

The 2017 amendment

, in (a)(i), inserted “Except as provided in W.S. 32-1-114(c).”

Laws 2017, ch. 40, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "32-3-110(c)" for "32-1-114(c)" in (a)(i); and in (a)(iii), substituted "notary public" for "notarial officer" and "sixty dollars ($60.00)" for "thirty dollars ($30.00)."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "ten dollars ($10.00)" for "three dollars ($3.00)" in (a)(i).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

§ 9-1-306.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 49, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to governmental electronic transactions, see §

9-2-2501

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1995, ch. 125, § 1, related to development and implementation of a statewide electronic filing system for records and documents required to be filed with the secretary of state.

§ 9-1-307.
Secretary of state; employment of legal counsel.

The secretary of state may employ legal counsel to review contracts entered into by the secretary of state in his official capacity and to perform other duties assigned by the secretary of state. Nothing in this section prohibits the secretary of state from using the services of the attorney general’s office.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 132, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 132, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 9-1-308.
Powers and duties; refusal to file documents; cease and desist orders.

The secretary of state may refuse to accept documents for filing pursuant to title 17 or title 34 of Wyoming statutes for up to five (5) years from any person or any entity if that person or entity:

Has filed any document with the secretary of state pursuant to title 17 or title 34 of Wyoming statutes that contained any statement which was fraudulent with respect to any material fact;

Makes or uses any false writing or document knowing it to contain any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or entry; or

Is the subject of, an agent of or acting on behalf of the subject of any order of the secretary of state or any similar order issued in another jurisdiction.

The secretary of state may issue a cease and desist order to any person or entity engaging in any practice described in paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section or any person or entity qualifying under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section.

Upon issuance of a cease and desist order under subsection (b) of this section, the secretary of state shall serve upon the person affected by the order, by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person’s last known address, an order specifically stating the acts complained of and requiring the person to immediately cease and desist from the act, methods or practices stated.

Any refusal to accept documents under subsection (a) of this section and any cease and desist order issued under subsection (b) of this section shall be in writing provided to the person affected by the refusal or order. The writing shall include a statement of the basis for the refusal or order and shall constitute a final order of the secretary of state.

Any refusal to accept documents under subsection (a) of this section and any order issued under subsection (b) of this section is subject to the notice and appeal provisions of W.S.

17-4-609

.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 10, § 1; 2016 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “17-4-609” for “17-4-123” in (e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 10, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.